District of Columbia statutes.
29-701.04

Nature, purpose, and duration of entity.

(a)

A limited partnership is an entity distinct from its partners. A limited partnership is the same entity regardless of whether its certificate states that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

(b)

A limited partnership may be formed under this chapter for any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

(c)

A limited partnership shall have a perpetual duration.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(2)(B), 59 DCR 13171

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 104 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210, in (b), substituted “formed” for “organized” and added “regardless of whether for profit.”
This section is referenced in § 29-711.01.